District of Columbia statutes.
29-1120

Procedural requirements for manager meetings.

(1)

Calling, location, and timing of manager meetings;

(2)

Notice and quorum requirements for manager meetings;

(3)

Conduct of manager meetings;

(4)

Taking of action by the managers by consent without a meeting; and

(5)

Participation by managers in a manager meeting by telephone or other means of electronic communication.

(b)

If the governing principles do not provide for a matter described in subsection (a) of this section, customary usages and principles of parliamentary law and procedure apply.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(k)(5), 59 DCR 13171
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 rewrote the section.

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 24 of the Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Act (2008 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.